Illinois, session 104th, HB1394.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Safety Employee Benefits Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 320/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Public Safety Employee Benefits Act.9(Source: P.A. 90-535, eff. 11-14-97.)